District of Columbia statutes.
47-895.05

Termination of Special Assessment.

The Special Assessment shall terminate on the earlier of:

(1)

September 30, 2044; or

(2)

At the end of the fiscal year when all the bonds are paid for and are no longer outstanding pursuant to their terms; provided, that any delinquent Special Assessments and related penalties and interest shall remain due until fully paid.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-252, § 301(b), 55 DCR 9251